Utah statutes.
61-1-25.   Record of registrations.

(1) (a)  A document is filed when it is received by the division.

(b)  If the last day prescribed for the filing of a document is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the document is considered timely filed if it is filed on the next succeeding day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

(2) (a)  The division shall keep a register of:

(i)  all applications for registration and registration statements that are or have ever been effective under this chapter; and

(ii)  all denial, suspension, or revocation orders entered under this chapter.

(b)  The register shall be open for public inspection.

(3)  The information contained in or filed with a registration statement, application, or report may be made available to the public under the rules the division prescribes.

(4) (a)  The division shall furnish to a person a photostatic or other copy, certified under seal if requested, of an entry in the register or any document that is a matter of public record:

(i)  upon request; and

(ii)  at a reasonable charge prescribed by the division.

(b)  In a proceeding or prosecution under this chapter, a copy certified under this Subsection (4) is prima facie evidence of the contents of the entry or document certified.

(5)  The division may issue an interpretative opinion requested by an interested person if the commission concurs in the interpretative opinion.

